Washington statutes.
RCW 15.65.530

Civil liability—Use of moneys recovered.

Any person who violates any provisions of this chapter or any marketing agreement or order duly issued and in effect pursuant to this chapter or who violates any rule or regulation issued by the director and/or his or her designee pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or of any marketing agreement or order duly issued by the director and in effect pursuant to this chapter, shall be liable civilly for a penalty in an amount not to exceed the sum of five hundred dollars for each and every violation thereof. Any moneys recovered pursuant to this section shall be allocated to and used for the purposes of the agreement or order concerned.

[ 2010 c 8 s 6089; 1961 c 256 s 53.]